Tennessee, session 114, HB1246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 47, Chapter 18, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
No later than July 1, 2026, the office of the attorney general and reporter shall
use existing resources to conduct a study and submit to the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over consumer protection and the chair of
the commerce and labor committee of the senate a report on the number of
investigations into violations of this part in which artificial intelligence was used to
effectuate an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting the conduct of any trade or
commerce. The report must provide information on such investigations for conduct
occurring between January 1, 2024, and December 31, 2025. The report may be
submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1246
003276
- 1 -